Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 12 TEACHERS
33-1210. Information on past job performance.

As used in this section:

“Applicant” means an applicant for employment in a certificated or noncertificated position who is currently or was previously employed by a school district.

“Employer” means a school district employer.

Before hiring an applicant, a school district shall request the applicant to sign a statement:

Authorizing the applicant’s current and past employers, including employers outside of the state of Idaho, to release to the hiring school district all information relating to the job performance and/or job related conduct, if any, of the applicant and making available to the hiring school district copies of all documents in the previous employer’s personnel files established pursuant to sections 33-517 or 33-518, Idaho Code, or investigative or other files, regardless of whether or not the employee has received notice of the existence of such documentation due to a voluntary separation from employment or the employee’s refusal to sign such documents, relating to the job performance by the applicant. Upon separation of employment, all documents from any other file, including an investigative file, shall be moved into the personnel file. The requirement to submit investigative files to the personnel file shall not be construed to be a waiver of the attorney client privilege. Names of any student, fellow employee or complainant, other than the employee’s administrative supervisor or administrative author shall be redacted from investigative file documents prior to placement in the personnel file. The former employee shall be provided a copy of the documents and written notice of the inclusion of the information in the personnel file to the former employee’s last known address. The former employee shall be permitted the opportunity to file a rebuttal to the new documents placed into the personnel file. If an ongoing personnel investigation was taking place, the contents of the district’s investigative file shall be forwarded to the professional standards commission when the district submits the report required pursuant to section 33-1208A, Idaho Code.

Documentation related to the job performance or job related conduct of any employee/applicant is defined as and may be limited by the producing district to include: all annual evaluations, letters of reprimand, letters of direction, letters of commendation or award, disciplinary actions and documentation of disciplinary investigations, recommendations for probation, notices of probation, notices of removal from probation, recommendations for termination or nonrenewal, notices of termination or nonrenewal, notices from the professional standards commission of Idaho or any other such similar state agency of action taken against an individual’s certificate and any rebuttal documentation filed by the employee relative to any of the above documents. Names of any student or fellow employee complainant, other than the employee’s administrative evaluator or administrative author of communication to the employee, shall be redacted from such provided documentation.

Releasing the applicant’s current and past employers, and employees acting on behalf of that employer, from any liability for providing information described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, as provided in subsection (4) of this section.

Before hiring an applicant, a school district shall request in writing, electronic or otherwise, the applicant’s current and past public school employers, including out-of-state employers, to provide the information described in subsection (2)(a) of this section, if any. The request shall include a copy of the statement signed by the applicant under subsection (2) of this section.

Not later than twenty (20) business days after receiving a request under subsection (3) of this section, a school district within Idaho shall provide the information requested and make available to the requesting school district copies of all documents in the applicant’s personnel record relating to job performance. The school district, or an employee acting on behalf of the school district, who in good faith discloses information under this section either in writing, printed material, electronic material or orally is immune from civil liability for the disclosure. An employer is presumed to be acting in good faith at the time of the disclosure under this section unless the evidence establishes one (1) or more of the following: (a) that the employer knew the information disclosed was false or misleading; (b) that the employer disclosed the information with reckless disregard for the truth; or (c) that the disclosure was specifically prohibited by a state or federal statute.

A hiring district shall request from the office of the superintendent of public instruction verification of certification status, any past or pending violations of the professional code of ethics, any detail as to any prior or pending conditions placed upon a certificate holder’s certificate, any prior or pending revocation, suspension or the existence of any prior letters of reprimand and information relating to job performance as established by the provisions of subsection (11) of this section, if any, for applicants for certificated employment.

A school district shall not hire an applicant who does not sign the statement described in subsection (2) of this section.

School districts may employ applicants on a noncontracted provisional basis pursuant to the provisions of this section. Once the prior employer personnel performance materials have arrived for an individual provisionally hired, the district must review the documents within thirty (30) days of receipt. A standard certificated contract shall automatically be issued at the end of the thirty (30) day review period unless, prior to the expiration of the thirty (30) day period, the board articulates in writing the specific information received pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, which justifies the decision not to issue a standard contract. The reason articulated in this decision must derive only from the documents received in the personnel file and cannot be based upon any event that has occurred during the status as a noncontracted provisional certified professional employee. Prior to issuing a standard certificated contract or prior to the decision not to issue a standard certificated contract, or upon the expiration of the thirty (30) day period, an individual employed as a noncontracted provisional certificated professional employee shall be provided with the same compensation and benefits as if the employee had been employed on a standard certificated contract. When requests are sent to out-of-state employers under subsection (3) of this section, an applicant who has signed the statement described in subsection (2) of this section shall not be prevented from gaining employment in Idaho public schools if the laws or policies of that other state prevent documents from being made available to Idaho school districts or if the out-of-state school district fails or refuses to cooperate with the request.

If no documentation is going to be forthcoming from an out-of-state employer, the Idaho district may initially employ the applicant on a standard contract and not utilize the conditional basis employment.

For new employees with no prior public school work experience or for applicants whose out-of-state former employers will not release documentation pursuant to this statute, the district board shall develop a policy to confirm prior work experience and check references.

Information received pursuant to this section shall be used by a school district only for the purpose of evaluating an applicant’s qualifications for employment in the position for which he or she has applied. Except as otherwise provided by law, a board member or employee of a school district shall not disclose the information to any person, other than the applicant, who is not directly involved in the process of evaluating the applicant’s qualifications for employment. A person who violates the provisions of this subsection may be civilly liable for damages caused by such violation.

Beginning September 1, 2011, the board or an official of a school district shall not enter into any resignation agreement, severance agreement, or any other contract or agreement that has the effect of suppressing information about negative job performance by a present or former employee or of expunging information about that performance or unethical conduct from any documents in the previous employer’s personnel, investigative or other files relating to job performance by the applicant. Any provision of a contract or agreement that is contrary to this subsection is void and unenforceable. This subsection does not restrict the expungement from a personnel file of information about alleged verbal or physical abuse or sexual misconduct that has not been substantiated.

This section does not prevent a school district from requesting or requiring an applicant to provide information other than that described in this section.

By September 1, 2012, the state board of education has the authority to and shall adopt rules defining job standards performance and “verbal abuse,” “physical abuse,” “sexual misconduct” and “unethical conduct” as defined in the code of ethics for Idaho professional educators for application to all certificated and noncertificated employees. The definitions of job standards performance, verbal and physical abuse and sexual misconduct adopted by the state board of education must include the requirement that the school district has made a determination that there is sufficient information to conclude that the abuse or unethical conduct occurred and that the abuse or unethical conduct resulted in the employee’s leaving his or her position at the school district.

33-1211. Privileged communication or publication.

Any publication or communication made by any member of the state board of education, or by any person delegated by the said state board to hold or conduct any hearing, or by any certification officer of the state board of education, in the proper discharge of any official duty imposed under section 33-1208 or 33-1209, Idaho Code, shall be subject to disclosure according to chapter 1, title 74, Idaho Code.

33-1212. School counselors.

In recognition of the diverse and complicated demands upon students, their families and the public school system, the legislature finds that counseling offered at Idaho public schools should be flexible and responsive. For purposes of counselor services, a counselor shall be defined as an individual who meets the requirements of an approved program of graduate study in school guidance and counseling from a college or university approved by the Idaho state board of education and who meets the requirements of rules adopted by the board, or an individual licensed as provided by chapter 32, title 54, Idaho Code, as a certified social worker and who meets the requirements of the state board of education.

School counselors spend most of their time in direct service to and contact with students. School counselors’ duties are focused on the overall delivery of guidance, individual student planning and responsive services. A small amount of their time is devoted to indirect services called system support.

The state board of education shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section, and shall specifically provide that certified social workers meet the requirement for school counselors. A local school district may request a waiver from the state board of education of the counselor/counseling requirements, provided that data is submitted to and annually approved by the state department of education to substantiate that the intent of the board’s rules in these areas is being met by an alternative program model.

33-1212A. College and career advisors and student mentors.

College and career advising and student mentoring is an essential component of students’ educational experience. Such advising and mentoring provide all students with an early opportunity to identify academic strengths, areas in need of improvement and areas of interest for the purpose of making informed choices and setting postsecondary education and career goals. The focus of college and career planning is to help students acquire the knowledge and skills necessary to achieve academic success and to be college and career ready upon high school graduation.

School districts and charter schools may employ noncertificated staff to serve in the role of college and career advisors and student mentors. Appropriate alternative forms of advising and mentoring shall be research-based and may include the following:

High contact programs such as:

Near peer or college student mentors; and

Counselor, teacher or paraprofessional as advisor or mentor;

Collaborative programs such as:

Student ambassadors; and

Cooperative agreements with other school districts or postsecondary institutions; and

Virtual coach or mentor programs.

School districts and charter schools shall provide professional development in the area of college and career advising to all staff serving in the role of student mentors or advisors. All individuals providing services in the role of a college and career advisor must have a basic level of training or experience in the area of advising or mentoring to provide such services.

School districts and charter schools shall develop a plan to deliver college and career advising to students in grades 8 through 12.

School districts and charter schools shall notify parents or guardians of all students in grades 8 through 12 of the availability of college and career advising provided by the district and how to access such services.

School districts and charter schools shall report annually on the effectiveness of their college and career advising programs as part of their annual continuous improvement plan. Reports shall include:

The type of program being implemented; and

Student outcomes indicating the effectiveness of the program.

The state board of education shall promulgate rules to specify those student outcomes that can be used to satisfy the reporting requirement, as well as other rules necessary for the administration of this section.

33-1213. Technology proficiency. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to S.L. 2004, ch. 372, § 2, effective July 1, 2009.

33-1214, 33-1215. Release from contract — Termination of employment or salary reduction. [Repealed.]

33-1216. Sick and other leave.

At the beginning of each new employment year and thereafter as necessary during the employment year, each noncertificated employee of any school district, including charter districts, who regularly works twenty (20) hours or more per week or certificated employee who works half time or more per week for a school district, including charter districts, shall be entitled to sick leave with full pay of one (1) day, as projected for the employment year for each month of service in which they work a majority portion of that month, subject to the limitations provided by this chapter. Sick leave for noncertificated employees shall be calculated proportionate to the average hours worked per day. Sick leave for certificated employees shall be calculated by the day, or percentage thereof, as defined in their individual employment contracts. The local board of trustees shall not provide compensation for unused sick leave. This shall not prohibit the local board of trustees from establishing a policy providing retirement severance pay.

The board of trustees may require proof of illness adequate to protect the district against malingering and false claims of illness. Any accumulated sick leave earned prior to July 1, 1976, shall be used before the use of any accumulated sick leave earned subsequent to July 1, 1976.

Each local board of trustees may establish a policy governing leave for certificated and noncertificated employees in the case of absence during a period for which the employee is paid by worker’s compensation. In addition the board may supplement the worker’s compensation payment by an amount not to exceed an amount which when combined with the worker’s compensation payment would be equal to the amount the employee would have been paid if he had not been injured. Supplementation may come from accrued vacation leave, compensatory time or sick leave time as may be provided in the policy of the district. Time for which a person is paid worker’s compensation shall not be allowed as straight sick leave which would result in duplicate compensation.

Each local board of trustees may establish a policy governing leave for certificated and noncertificated employees in the case of illness or death of members of the families of such employees, for professional conferences and workshops, and for such other purposes as the board may determine.

33-1217. Accrued unused sick leave — Transfer.

Unused sick leave shall accrue from year to year as long as an employee remains continuously in the service of the same school district, including charter districts. Termination of employment in any district shall terminate sick leave rights, both current and accrued, except when such employee is employed by a public education entity or by a state educational agency, as such terms are defined in section 67-5302, Idaho Code, during the school year immediately following the year of termination or within three (3) school years immediately following the year of termination if termination of employment is due to a reduction in force; and the accrued sick leave shall be secured for, and credited to, the employee by the public education entity or state educational agency thereafter employing such employee. Any state educational agency employee or public education entity employee who obtains employment with a school district during the current or subsequent school year following termination shall be credited any unused sick leave accrued during state employment. Whenever new school districts are formed by the consolidation or by the division of existing districts, the accrued sick leave of school district employees who continue in service in the new district or districts created by such consolidation or division shall have such accrued sick leave secured for and credited to them in such newly created district or districts.

33-1217A. Providing for the use of sick leave. [Repealed.]

33-1218. Sick leave in excess of statutory minimum amounts — Proof of illness.

The board of trustees may fix and establish for the district a period of annual sick leave and accumulation of sick leave in excess of the amounts provided herein, in sections 33-1216 and 33-1217, Idaho Code, not discriminatory between employees, and as in its discretion may appear necessary, and may require proof of illness in accordance with section 33-1216, Idaho Code.

33-1219. Minimum salary schedule. [Repealed.]

33-1220. In-service training — Halting service increments.

The board of trustees of any school district may establish for the district, uniform requirements for in-service training of certificated personnel; and the board may upon notice halt teaching service increments otherwise due any such employee upon neglect or failure to fulfill such requirement, until said requirement shall have been met.

33-1221. Sales of services or merchandise limited.

No person employed by any public school district shall, either as a principal or as an agent, sell or offer to sell to pupils attending school in the district, or to a parent or guardian of any such pupil, any services or merchandise to be used, or intended to be used, in the schools in connection with activities or studies therein, except under such rules and regulations which shall be adopted by the board of trustees of the district employing such person.

Nothing herein shall limit a board of trustees from purchasing books, supplies or other equipment which may be sold to pupils attending any school in the district.

33-1222. Freedom from abuse.

Certificated employees of every school district shall be free from abuse by parents or other adults, as provided in section 18-916, Idaho Code.

33-1223. Exemption from jury duty. [Repealed.]

33-1224. Powers and duties of teachers.

In the absence of any statute or rule or regulation of the board of trustees, any teacher employed by a school district shall have the right to direct how and when each pupil shall attend to his appropriate duties, and the manner in which a pupil shall demean himself while in attendance at the school. It is the duty of a teacher to carry out the rules and regulations of the board of trustees in controlling and maintaining discipline, and a teacher shall have the power to adopt any reasonable rule or regulation to control and maintain discipline in, and otherwise govern, the classroom, not inconsistent with any statute or rule or regulation of the board of trustees.

33-1225. Threats of violence — Limitation on liability.

A communication by any person to a school principal, or designee, or a communication by a student attending the school to the student’s teacher, school counselor or school nurse, and any report of that communication to the school principal stating that a specific person has made a threat to commit violence on school grounds by use of a firearm, explosive, or deadly weapon defined in chapter 33, title 18, Idaho Code, is a communication on a matter of public concern. Such communication or report shall only be subject to liability in defamation by clear and convincing evidence that the communication or report was made with knowledge of its falsity or with reckless disregard for the truth or falsity of the communication or report. This section shall not be interpreted to change or eliminate other elements of defamation required by law.

As used in this section, “school” means any public or private school providing instruction in kindergarten or any grades from grade one (1) through grade twelve (12) which is the subject of a threat.

33-1226, 33-1227. School employees — Tuberculosis examinations. [Repealed.]

33-1228. Severance allowance at retirement.

Upon separation from public school employment by retirement in accordance with chapter 13, title 59, Idaho Code, an employee’s unused sick leave shall be determined based on accumulated sick leave earned subsequent to July 1, 1976, as provided by section 33-1218, Idaho Code, and shall be reported by the employer to the Idaho public employee retirement system. A sum equal to one-half (½) of the monetary value of such unused sick leave, calculated at the rate of pay for such employee during the employee’s highest year of salary used in the average monthly salary, as determined by the retirement board, shall be transferred from the sick leave account provided by subsection (3) of this section and shall be credited to such employee’s retirement account. Such sums shall be used by the retirement board to continue to pay, subject to applicable federal tax limits:

Premiums for the retiree and the retiree’s dependents at the rate for the active employee’s group health, long-term care, vision, prescription drug and dental insurance programs as maintained by the employer for the active employees until the retiree and/or the retiree’s spouse becomes eligible for medicare at which time the district shall make available a supplemental program to medicare for the eligible individual. Upon the death of the retiree, the surviving spouse’s health coverage shall be available and continued under the same terms and conditions as the retiree. Coverage may be continued for the retiree’s surviving dependent spouse and dependents until remarriage of the spouse or until the retiree’s surviving dependent spouse is eligible for a group health program by an employer. The medicare supplement program will provide the same premium and benefits for all retirees of all the employers served by the same insurance carrier. However, a school district may make available to all retirees from that district other benefits in addition to the medicare supplement program, and the retiree or the district shall pay for such additional benefits.

Premiums at the time of retirement for the retiree for the life insurance program maintained by the employer which may be reduced to a minimum of five thousand dollars ($5,000) of coverage.

The retiree may continue to pay the premiums for the health, accident, dental and life insurance to the extent of the funds credited to the employee’s account pursuant to this section, and when these funds are expended, the premiums may be deducted from the retiree’s allowance. Upon a retiree’s death, any unexpended sums remaining in the retiree’s account shall revert to the sick leave account. If funds are not available for payment by the Idaho public employee retirement system from the retiree’s surviving dependent spouse’s allowance, the insurance carrier shall implement a direct billing procedure to permit the retiree’s surviving spouse to continue coverage.

Each employer shall contribute to a sick leave account maintained by the public employee retirement system in trust exclusively for the purpose of the provisions of this section. The retirement board shall serve as trustee of the trust and shall be indemnified to the same extent as provided in section 59-1305, Idaho Code. Assets in the trust shall not be assignable or subject to execution, garnishment or attachment or to the operation of any bankruptcy or insolvency law. The rate of such contribution each pay period shall consist of a percentage of employees’ salaries as determined by the board, and such rate shall remain in effect until next determined by the board. Any excess balance in the sick leave account shall be invested, and the earnings therefrom shall accrue to the sick leave account except the amount required by the board to defray administrative expenses. Assets of the trust may be commingled for investment purposes with other assets managed by the retirement board. All moneys payable to the sick leave account are hereby perpetually appropriated to the board and shall not be included in its departmental budget.
(4) For purposes of this section public school employment shall be defined to include the employees of the Idaho digital learning academy, and to permit inclusion of employees of organizations funded by school districts or of contributions of employees of school districts and shall include employees of the Idaho bureau of educational services for the deaf and the blind.

33-1229 — 33-1250. [Reserved.]

This act shall be known and cited as the “public schools professional standards act.”

33-1252. Professional standards commission — Members — Appointment — Terms.

A professional standards commission is hereby created in the department of education, consisting of eighteen (18) members, one (1) of whom shall be a member of the staff of the state department of education, and one (1) of whom shall be a member of the staff of the division of career technical education, to be appointed by the state board of education. The members shall be representative of the teaching profession of the state of Idaho, and not less than seven (7) members shall be certificated classroom teachers in the public school system of the state and shall include at least one (1) teacher of exceptional children and at least one (1) teacher in pupil personnel services. Such expansion of membership on the professional standards commission shall not require reaffirmation of the codes and standards of ethics and rules of procedure used by the professional standards commission.

Except for the member from the staff of the state department of education, and the member from the staff of the division of career technical education, three (3) nominees for each position on the commission shall be submitted to the state superintendent of public instruction, for the consideration of the state board of education. Any state organization of teachers whose membership is open to all certificated teachers in the state may submit nominees for positions to be held by classroom teachers; the Idaho association of school superintendents may submit nominees for one (1) position, the Idaho association of secondary school principals may submit nominees for one (1) position; the Idaho association of elementary school principals may submit nominees for one (1) position; the Idaho school boards association may submit nominees for one (1) position; the Idaho association of special education administrators may submit nominees for one (1) position; the education departments of the private colleges of the state may submit nominees for one (1) position, the community colleges and the education departments of the public institutions of higher education may submit nominees for two (2) positions, and the colleges of letters and sciences of the institutions of higher education may submit nominees for one (1) position.

The state board of education shall appoint or reappoint members of the commission for terms of three (3) years.

33-1253. Chairman and vice-chairman — Secretary — Rule making.

At the first meeting of the commission, after the appointment of its members, it shall organize itself and name from among its members a chairman and vice-chairman who shall act in the absence of the chairman; it shall also name a secretary who may or may not be a member. The commission shall from time to time adopt such rules as are necessary to the conduct of its business.

33-1254. Professional codes and standards — Adoption — Publication.

The commission shall have authority to adopt recognized professional codes and standards of ethics, conduct and professional practices which shall be applicable to teachers in the public schools of the state, and submit the same to the state board of education for its consideration and approval. Upon their approval by the state board of education, the professional codes and standards shall be published by the board.

33-1255 — 33-1257. Hearings — Administrative and legal remedies. [Repealed.]

33-1258. Recommendations to improve professional standard.

The commission may make recommendations to the state board of education in such areas as teacher education, teacher certification and teaching standards, and such recommendations to the state board of education or to boards of trustees of school districts as, in its judgment, will promote improvement of professional practices and competence of the teaching profession of this state, it being the intent of this act to continually improve the quality of education in the public schools of this state.

33-1259 — 33-1270. [Reserved.]

The board of trustees of each school district, including specially chartered districts, or the designated representative(s) of such district, is hereby empowered to and shall, upon its own initiative or upon the request of a local education organization representing a majority of the professional employees, enter into a negotiation agreement with the local education organization or the designated representative(s) of such organization.

The parties to such negotiations shall negotiate in good faith on those matters specified in any such negotiation agreement between the local board of trustees and the local education organization.

A request for negotiations may be initiated by either party to such negotiation agreement.

Upon either party making a request for negotiations, the local education organization, upon board request, shall provide to the district written evidence establishing that the local education organization represents fifty percent (50%) plus one (1) of the professional employees for negotiations. If requested by the board, the local education organization shall establish this representative status on an annual basis, prior to the commencement of negotiations. In order to establish a local education organization’s representative status, a local education organization must show that within the last two (2) years, fifty percent (50%) plus one (1) of the professional employees, as defined in section 33-1272, Idaho Code, indicated agreement to be represented by the local education organization for negotiation purposes. Evidence of fifty percent (50%) plus one (1) inconsistent with this provision shall not be counted in the establishment of representative status.

Accurate records or minutes of the proceedings shall be kept and shall be available for public inspection at the office of the affected school district during normal business hours.

Joint ratification of all final offers of settlement shall be made in open meetings. Each party must provide written evidence confirming to the other that majority ratification has occurred.

33-1271A. Existing agreements. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to rejection of Proposition 1 on November 6, 2012.

33-1272. Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Professional employee” means any certificated employee of a school district, including charter districts; provided however, that administrative personnel including superintendents, supervisors or principals are excluded from the professional employee group for the purposes of negotiations.

“Local education organization” means any local district organization duly chosen and selected by fifty percent (50%) plus one (1) of the professional employees, excluding administrative personnel as addressed in this section, as their representative organization for negotiations under this act.

“Negotiations” means publicly meeting and conferring in good faith by a local board of trustees and the authorized local education organization, or the respective designated representatives of both parties for the purpose of reaching an agreement, upon matters and conditions subject to negotiations as specified in a negotiation agreement between said parties.

For the purposes of this section, “good faith” means honesty, fairness and lawfulness of purpose with the absence of any intent to defraud, act maliciously or take unfair advantage or the observance of reasonable standards of fair dealing.

33-1273. School districts — Professional employees — Negotiations.

The local education organization shall be the exclusive representative for all professional employees in that district for purposes of negotiations pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The individual or individuals selected to negotiate for the professional employees shall be a member of the organization designated to represent the professional employees and shall be a professional employee of the local school district. However, in the event a local board of trustees chooses to designate any individual(s) other than the superintendent or elected trustee(s) of the school district as its representative(s) for negotiations, the local educational organization is authorized to designate any individual(s) of its choosing to act as its representative(s) for negotiations. Negotiations pursuant to this chapter shall only occur between the respective designated representatives.

33-1273A. Negotiations in open session. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 271, § 3, effective July 1, 2015.

33-1274. Appointment of mediators — Compensation.

In the event the parties in negotiations are not able to come to an agreement upon items submitted for negotiations under a negotiations agreement between the parties, one or more mediators may be appointed. The issue or issues in dispute shall be submitted to mediation at the request of either party in an effort to induce the representatives of the board and the local education organization to resolve the conflict. The procedures for appointment of and compensation for the mediators shall be determined by both parties.

33-1274A. Procedures upon agreement. [Null and void.]

Null and void, pursuant to rejection of Proposition 1 on November 6, 2012.

33-1275. Terms of agreements.

All agreements, by any name or title, entered into pursuant to the provisions of this act, shall have a one (1) year duration of July 1 through June 30 of the ensuing fiscal year. The parties shall not have the authority to enter into any agreement negotiated under the provisions of this act that has any term that allows for such agreement or any provision of such agreement to be in any force or effect for multiple years or indefinitely, or otherwise does not expire on its own terms on or before June 30 of the ensuing fiscal year.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, upon mutual ratification, any item other than compensation and benefits as defined in subsection (3) of this section of any agreement entered into pursuant to this act may have a nonrolling two (2) year duration with a designated start date and end date. A second year term for any item not defined in subsection (3) of this section cannot be added, automatically or by mutual consent, back into the agreement after the expiration of the first year but rather may be addressed by the parties at the expiration of the end date of the two (2) year term.

For purposes of this section, “compensation” means salary and benefits for professional employees. “Benefits” means employee insurance, leave time and sick leave benefits.

33-1276. Intent of act.

Nothing contained herein is intended to or shall conflict with, or abrogate the powers or duties and responsibilities vested in the legislature, state board of education, and the board of trustees of school districts by the laws of the state of Idaho. Each school district board of trustees is entitled, without negotiation or reference to any negotiated agreement, to take action that may be necessary to carry out its responsibility due to situations of emergency or acts of God.

33-1277, 33-1278. [Reserved.]

Each certificated employee of any school district, including specially chartered districts, shall be entitled to and be allowed released time for service on committees and commissions established by the state of Idaho, or established by the legislature, or established by any of the departments or agencies of the state of Idaho.

No such certificated employee shall lose any salary or other benefits because of such released time for service on any such committee or commission and shall not be required to make up any released time spent in serving on any such committee or commission; except that the amount of any honorarium or compensation received for service on committees or commissions, except actual and necessary expenses, shall be deducted from salary otherwise due such certificated employee.

Each certificated employee shall be entitled to five (5) such days of released time, and time beyond five (5) days shall be allowed at the discretion of the board of trustees.